Utah statutes.
16-10a-401 (Superseded 07/01/12).   Corporate name.

(1)  The name of a corporation:

(a)  except for the name of a depository institution as defined in Section 7-1-103, shall contain:

(i)  the word:

(A)  "corporation";

(B)  "incorporated"; or

(C)  "company";

(ii)  the abbreviation:

(A)  "corp.";

(B)  "inc."; or

(C)  "co."; or

(iii)  words or abbreviations of like import to the words or abbreviations listed in Subsections (1)(a)(i) and (ii) in another language;

(b)  may not contain language stating or implying that the corporation is organized for a purpose other than that permitted by:

(i)  Section 16-10a-301; and

(ii)  the corporation's articles of incorporation;

(c)  without the written consent of the United States Olympic Committee, may not contain the words:

(i)  "Olympic";

(ii)  "Olympiad"; or

(iii)  "Citius Altius Fortius"; and

(d)  without the written consent of the Division of Consumer Protection issued in accordance with Section 13-34-114, may not contain the words:

(i)  "university";

(ii)  "college"; or

(iii)  "institute" or "institution."

(2)  Except as authorized by Subsections (3) and (4), the name of a corporation shall be distinguishable, as defined in Subsection (5), upon the records of the division from:

(a)  the name of any domestic corporation incorporated in or foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state;

(b)  the name of any domestic or foreign nonprofit corporation incorporated or authorized to transact business in this state;

(c)  the name of any domestic or foreign limited liability company formed or authorized to transact business in this state;

(d)  the name of any limited partnership formed or authorized to transact business in this state;

(e)  any name reserved or registered with the division for a corporation, limited liability company, or general or limited partnership, under the laws of this state; and

(f)  any business name, fictitious name, assumed name, trademark, or service mark registered by the division.

(3) (a)  A corporation may apply to the division for authorization to file its articles of incorporation under, or to register or reserve, a name that is not distinguishable upon its records from one or more of the names described in Subsection (2).

(b)  The division shall approve the application filed under Subsection (3)(a) if:

(i)  the other person whose name is not distinguishable from the name under which the applicant desires to file, or which the applicant desires to register or reserve:

(A)  consents to the filing, registration, or reservation in writing; and

(B)  submits an undertaking in a form satisfactory to the division to change its name to a name that is distinguishable from the name of the applicant; or

(ii)  the applicant delivers to the division a certified copy of the final judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction establishing the applicant's right to make the requested filing in this state under the name applied for.

(4)  A corporation may make a filing under the name, including the fictitious name, of another domestic or foreign corporation that is used or registered in this state if:

(a)  the other corporation is incorporated or authorized to transact business in this state; and

(b)  the filing corporation:

(i)  has merged with the other corporation; or

(ii)  has been formed by reorganization of the other corporation.

(5) (a)  A name is distinguishable from other names, trademarks, and service marks on the records of the division if it:

(i)  contains one or more different letters or numerals; or

(ii)  has a different sequence of letters or numerals from the other names on the division's records.

(b)  Differences which are not distinguishing are:

(i)  the words or abbreviations of the words:

(A)  "corporation";

(B)  "company";

(C)  "incorporated";

(D)  "limited partnership";

(E)  "L.P.";

(F)  "limited";

(G)  "ltd.";

(H)  "limited liability company";

(I)  "limited company";

(J)  "L.C."; or

(K)  "L.L.C.";

(ii)  the presence or absence of the words or symbols of the words "the," "and," or "a";

(iii)  differences in punctuation and special characters;

(iv)  differences in capitalization;

(v)  differences between singular and plural forms of words for a corporation:

(A)  incorporated in or authorized to do business in this state on or after May 4, 1998; or

(B)  that changes its name on or after May 4, 1998;

(vi)  differences in whether the letters or numbers immediately follow each other or are separated by one or more spaces if:

(A)  the sequence of letters or numbers is identical; and

(B)  the corporation:

(I)  is incorporated in or authorized to do business in this state on or after May 3, 1999; or

(II)  changes its name on or after May 3, 1999; or

(vii)  differences in abbreviations, for a corporation:

(A)  incorporated in or authorized to do business in this state on or after May 1, 2000; or

(B)  that changes its name on or after May 1, 2000.

(c)  The director of the division has the power and authority reasonably necessary to interpret and efficiently administer this section and to perform the duties imposed on the division by this section.

(6)  A name that implies that the corporation is an agency of this state or of any of its political subdivisions, if it is not actually such a legally established agency or subdivision, may not be approved for filing by the division.

(7) (a)  The requirements of Subsection (1)(d) do not apply to a corporation incorporated in or authorized to do business in this state on or before May 4, 1998, until December 31, 1998.

(b)  On or after January 1, 1999, any corporation incorporated in or authorized to do business in this state shall comply with the requirements of Subsection (1)(d).

